Utah statutes.
31A-36-116.   Other law enforcement or regulatory authority.

This chapter does not:

(1)  preempt the authority or relieve the duty of other law enforcement or regulatory agencies to investigate, examine, and prosecute suspected violations of law;

(2)  prevent or prohibit a person from disclosing voluntarily information concerning life settlement fraud to a law enforcement or regulatory agency other than the insurance department; or

(3)  limit the powers granted elsewhere by law to the commissioner or an insurance fraud unit to investigate and examine possible violations of law and to take appropriate action.



Amended by Chapter 355, 2009 General Session

